Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.070

Forwarding of notification and sunrise note to committees when standing committee votes out bill creating board or special purpose district.

Legislative standing committees shall forward notification and the sunrise note, if available, to the senate or house of representatives ways and means committee and the senate governmental operations committee or the house of representatives state government committee whenever a bill providing for the creation of a new board or special purpose district is voted out of the standing committee.

[ 1987 c 342 s 7.]